Wisconsin, session 2025, SB895.
do enact as follows:SB895,13Section 1. 20.370 (4) (ht) of the statutes is created to read:SB895,1,6420.370 (4) (ht) Battery collection and recycling programs. From the 5environmental fund, all moneys received under s. 287.175 (3) (b) to implement the 6battery collection and recycling program under s. 287.175.SB895,27Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.SB895,2,21(1) If neither Assembly Bill 713 nor Senate Bill 702 are enacted in the 2025-26 2legislative session, then this act is void.SB895,2,33